Maryland, session 2025, HB0420.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–426.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Anaphylaxis” means a sudden, severe, and potentially life–threatening
allergic reaction that occurs when an individual is exposed to an allergen.
(3) [“Auto–injectable] “EMERGENCY USE epinephrine” means a portable,
disposable drug delivery device OR PRODUCT APPROVED BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND
DRUG ADMINISTRATION that contains a premeasured single dose of epinephrine that is
used to treat anaphylaxis in an emergency situation.
(b) Each county board shall establish a policy for public schools within its
jurisdiction to authorize the school nurse and other school personnel to administer
[auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine, if available, to a student who is
determined to be or perceived to be in anaphylaxis, regardless of whether the student:
(1) Has been identified as having an anaphylactic allergy, as defined in §
7–426.1 of this subtitle; or
(2) Has a prescription for epinephrine as prescribed by an authorized
licensed health care practitioner under the Health Occupations Article.
(c) The policy established under subsection (b) of this section shall include:
(1) Training for school personnel on how to recognize the symptoms of
anaphylaxis;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 711
(2) Procedures for the emergency administration of [auto–injectable]
EMERGENCY USE epinephrine;
(3) The proper follow–up emergency procedures;
(4) A provision authorizing a school nurse to obtain and store at a public
school [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine to be used in an emergency
situation; and
(5) A requirement that each public school develop and implement a method
for notifying the parents or guardians of students of the school’s policy under this section
at the beginning of each school year.
(d) Except for any willful or grossly negligent act, a school nurse or other school
personnel who respond in good faith to the anaphylactic reaction of a child in accordance
with this section may not be held personally liable for any act or omission in the course of
responding to the reaction.
(e) (1) Each public school shall submit, on the form that the Department
requires, a report to the Department on each incident at the school or at a related school
event that required the use of [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine.
(2) The Department shall develop and disseminate a standard form to
report each incident requiring the use of [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine
at a public school.
7–426.3.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Anaphylaxis” means a sudden, severe, and potentially life–threatening
allergic reaction that occurs when an individual is exposed to an allergen.
(3) [“Auto–injectable] “EMERGENCY USE epinephrine” means a portable,
disposable drug delivery device OR PRODUCT APPROVED BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND
DRUG ADMINISTRATION that contains a premeasured single dose of epinephrine that is
used to treat anaphylaxis in an emergency situation.
(4) “School personnel” means individuals who are employed by a nonpublic
school, including part–time employees, teachers and substitute teachers employed by the
school for at least 7 days each school year, a school nurse, registered nurse case manager,
delegating nurse, and administrative staff.
(b) Each nonpublic school in the State may establish a policy authorizing school
personnel to administer [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine, if available, to a
– 3 –

Ch. 711 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
student who is determined to be or perceived to be in anaphylaxis, regardless of whether
the student:
(1) Has been identified as having an anaphylactic allergy, as defined in §
7–426.1 of this subtitle; or
(2) Has a prescription for epinephrine as prescribed by an authorized
licensed health care practitioner under the Health Occupations Article.
(c) The policy established under subsection (b) of this section shall include:
(1) Training for school personnel on how to recognize the signs and
symptoms of anaphylaxis by a licensed health care practitioner who is authorized to
administer [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine and who has been trained in
an established protocol on how to recognize the signs and symptoms of anaphylaxis;
(2) Procedures for the emergency administration of [auto–injectable]
EMERGENCY USE epinephrine;
(3) The proper follow–up emergency procedures;
(4) A provision authorizing a school nurse or other licensed health care
practitioner to obtain, and[,] school personnel to store, at a nonpublic school
[auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine to be used in an emergency situation;
(5) A requirement that the nonpublic school develop and implement a
method for notifying the parents or guardians of students of the school’s policy under this
section at the beginning of each school year; and
(6) An ongoing process for oversight and monitoring by a licensed health
care practitioner of the implementation of the policy established under subsection (b) of this
section.
(d) Except for any willful or grossly negligent act, school personnel who respond
in good faith to the anaphylactic reaction of a child in accordance with this section may not
be held personally liable for any act or omission in the course of responding to the reaction.
9.5–117.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) [“Auto–injectable] “EMERGENCY USE epinephrine” has the meaning
stated in § 7–426.2 of this article.
(f) Except for any willfully or grossly negligent act, a child care provider or an
employee of a child care provider who responds in good faith to the anaphylactic reaction
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 711
of a child in accordance with the guidelines implemented under this section or by use of
[auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine is immune from civil liability for any act
or omission in the course of responding to the reaction.
Article – Health – General
13–702.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Agent” means an individual who:
(1) Is at least 18 years of age;
(2) Has successfully completed, at the expense of an applicant, an
educational training program approved by the Department; and
(3) Is appointed by a certificate holder to administer [auto–injectable]
EMERGENCY USE epinephrine in accordance with the provisions of this subtitle.
(c) “Anaphylaxis” means a sudden, severe, and potentially life–threatening
allergic reaction that occurs when an individual is exposed to an allergen.
[(d) “Auto–injectable epinephrine” means a portable, disposable drug delivery
device that contains a premeasured single dose of epinephrine that is used to treat
anaphylaxis in an emergency situation.]
[(e)] (D) “Certificate” means a certificate or an endorsement on the operating
certificate of a youth camp issued by the Department to an individual who operates a youth
camp under Title 14, Subtitle 4 of this article to obtain, store, and administer
[auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine.
[(f)] (E) “Certificate holder” means an individual who is authorized by the
Department to obtain, store, and administer [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE
epinephrine to be used in an emergency situation.
(F) “EMERGENCY USE EPINEPHRINE” MEANS A PORTABLE, DISPOSABLE
DRUG DELIVERY DEVICE OR PRODUCT APPROVED BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND
DRUG ADMINISTRATION THAT CONTAINS A PREMEASURED SINGLE DOSE OF
EPINEPHRINE THAT IS USED TO TREAT ANAPHYLAXIS IN AN EMERGENCY SITUATION.
(g) “Program” means the Emergency and Allergy Treatment Program.
(h) “Registered nurse practitioner” has the meaning stated in § 8–101 of the
Health Occupations Article.
– 5 –

Ch. 711 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) “Youth camp” has the meaning stated in § 14–401 of this article.
13–704.
(e) An applicant shall have a written policy that includes:
(1) Authorization for the certificate holder or agent to administer
[auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine, if available, to an individual who has
been determined to be or is believed to be experiencing anaphylaxis, whether or not the
individual:
(i) Has previously been known to have experienced anaphylaxis; or
(ii) Has a prescription for epinephrine prescribed by an authorized
health care practitioner licensed under the Health Occupations Article;
(2) A requirement that youth camp personnel complete training on how to
recognize the symptoms of anaphylaxis;
(3) Procedures for the emergency administration of [auto–injectable]
EMERGENCY USE epinephrine;
(4) Procedures for proper emergency follow–up;
(5) Authorization for a certificate holder to obtain and store
[auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine to be used in an emergency; and
(6) A requirement that each certificate holder implement a method for
notifying the parent or guardian of a camper of the youth camp’s policy under this section
before the camper’s attendance.
13–705.
(a) (1) A registered nurse practitioner or a physician licensed to practice
medicine in the State may prescribe [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine in
the name of a certificate holder.
(2) A registered nurse practitioner, a pharmacist licensed to practice
pharmacy in the State, or a physician may dispense [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE
epinephrine under a prescription issued to a certificate holder.
(b) A certificate holder may:
(1) On presentment of a certificate, receive from any registered nurse
practitioner or any physician licensed to practice medicine in the State a prescription for
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 711
[auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine and the necessary paraphernalia for the
administration of [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine; and
(2) Possess and store prescribed [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE
epinephrine and the necessary paraphernalia for the administration of [auto–injectable]
EMERGENCY USE epinephrine.
(c) In an emergency situation when registered nurse practitioner, physician, or
emergency medical services are not immediately available, a certificate holder or agent may
administer [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine to an individual who is
experiencing or believed in good faith by the certificate holder or agent to be experiencing
anaphylaxis.
13–706.
(a) A certificate holder shall submit to the Department, on a form required by the
Department, a report of each incident that occurs while the youth camp is in session that
required the administration of [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine.
13–707.
(a) A cause of action may not arise against a certificate holder or agent authorized
under this subtitle for any act or omission when the certificate holder or agent is acting in
good faith while administering [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine to an
individual experiencing or believed by the certificate holder or agent to be experiencing
anaphylaxis, except where the conduct of the certificate holder or agent amounts to gross
negligence, willful or wanton misconduct, or intentionally tortious conduct.
(b) (1) A cause of action may not arise against any physician for any act or
omission when the physician in good faith prescribes or dispenses [auto–injectable]
EMERGENCY USE epinephrine and the necessary paraphernalia for the administration of
[auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine to a person certified by the Department
under this subtitle.
(2) A cause of action may not arise against any pharmacist for any act or
omission when the pharmacist in good faith dispenses [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE
epinephrine and the necessary paraphernalia for the administration of [auto–injectable]
EMERGENCY USE epinephrine to a person certified by the Department under this subtitle.
(3) A cause of action may not arise against any nurse practitioner for any
act or omission when the nurse practitioner in good faith prescribes or dispenses
[auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine and the necessary paraphernalia for the
administration of [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine to a person certified by
the Department under this subtitle.
– 7 –

Ch. 711 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
13–708.
(b) An individual may not be held civilly liable in any action arising from or in
connection with the administration of [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine by
the individual solely because the individual did not possess a certificate issued under this
subtitle.
Subtitle 7A. Emergency Use [Auto–Injectable] Epinephrine Program.
13–7A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Agent” means an individual who:
(1) Is at least 18 years of age;
(2) Has successfully completed, at the expense of the participating facility,
an educational training program approved by the Department under § 13–7A–03 of this
subtitle; and
(3) Is designated by a certificate holder to administer [auto–injectable]
EMERGENCY USE epinephrine in accordance with the provisions of this subtitle.
(c) “Anaphylaxis” means a sudden, severe, and potentially life–threatening
allergic reaction that occurs when an individual is exposed to an allergen.
[(d) “Auto–injectable epinephrine” means a portable, disposable drug delivery
device that contains a premeasured single dose of epinephrine that is used to treat
anaphylaxis in an emergency situation.]
[(e)] (D) “Certificate” means a certificate issued by the Department to an
individual to obtain, store, and administer [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE
epinephrine.
[(f)] (E) “Certificate holder” means an individual who is authorized by the
Department to obtain, store, and administer [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE
epinephrine to be used in an emergency situation.
[(g)] (F) “Eligible institution” means an institution of higher education that has
a food service facility or a recreation and wellness facility on the premises and that is
authorized under this subtitle to obtain and store [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE
epinephrine.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 711
(G) “EMERGENCY USE EPINEPHRINE” MEANS A PORTABLE, DISPOSABLE
DRUG DELIVERY DEVICE OR PRODUCT APPROVED BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND
DRUG ADMINISTRATION THAT CONTAINS A PREMEASURED SINGLE DOSE OF
EPINEPHRINE THAT IS USED TO TREAT ANAPHYLAXIS IN AN EMERGENCY SITUATION.
(h) “Food service facility” has the meaning indicated in § 21–301 of this article.
(i) “Participating facility” means a recreation or wellness facility at an eligible
institution or a food service facility, including a food service facility at an eligible
institution, in the State that voluntarily participates in the Program.
(j) “Program” means the Emergency Use [Auto–Injectable] Epinephrine
Program established under § 13–7A–02 of this subtitle.
13–7A–02.
(a) There is an Emergency Use [Auto–Injectable] Epinephrine Program.
(b) The purpose of the Program is to authorize individuals employed by a
participating facility to obtain and store [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine
and administer [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine to individuals who are
experiencing or are believed to be experiencing anaphylaxis when a physician or emergency
medical services are not immediately available.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, each participating facility
may obtain:
(i) A prescription for a supply of [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY
USE epinephrine from a licensed physician as provided in § 13–7A–06 of this subtitle; and
(ii) A supply of [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine
from a licensed pharmacist or a licensed physician as provided in § 13–7A–06 of this
subtitle.
(2) Each participating facility shall store a supply of [auto–injectable]
EMERGENCY USE epinephrine obtained under paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection:
(i) In accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions; and
(ii) In a location that is readily accessible to employees or affiliated
individuals in an emergency situation.
(3) Each participating facility shall designate the employees who are
certificate holders or designated affiliated individuals who are certificate holders who will
– 9 –

Ch. 711 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
be responsible for the storage, maintenance, and control of the supply of [auto–injectable]
EMERGENCY USE epinephrine.
(4) A participating facility may not obtain or store [auto–injectable]
EMERGENCY USE epinephrine unless the participating facility has at least two employees
or designated affiliated individuals who are certificate holders.
(5) Each participating facility shall maintain a copy of the certificate issued
to an employee or a designated affiliated individual under § 13–7A–05 of this subtitle.
13–7A–03.
(a) The Department shall:
(5) Develop a method by which certificate holders may submit a report to
the Department about each incident that occurred on the premises of a participating facility
that involved the administration of [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine by a
certificate holder or an agent; and
13–7A–06.
(a) (1) A physician licensed to practice medicine in the State may prescribe
[auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine in the name of a certificate holder.
(2) A pharmacist licensed to practice pharmacy in the State or a physician
may dispense [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine under a prescription issued
to a certificate holder.
(b) A certificate holder may:
(1) On presentment of a certificate, receive from any physician licensed to
practice medicine in the State a prescription for [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE
epinephrine and the necessary paraphernalia for the administration of [auto–injectable]
EMERGENCY USE epinephrine; and
(2) Possess and store prescribed [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE
epinephrine and the necessary paraphernalia for the administration of [auto–injectable]
EMERGENCY USE epinephrine.
(c) In an emergency situation when a physician or emergency medical services
are not immediately available, a certificate holder or an agent may administer
[auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine to an individual who is experiencing or is
believed in good faith by the certificate holder or agent to be experiencing anaphylaxis.
13–7A–07.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 711
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a cause of action
may not arise against a certificate holder for any act or omission if the certificate holder or
agent is acting in good faith while administering [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE
epinephrine to an individual who is experiencing or believed by the certificate holder or
agent to be experiencing anaphylaxis except where the conduct of the certificate holder or
agent amounts to gross negligence, willful or wanton misconduct, or intentionally tortious
conduct.
(2) The provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection do not apply if a
certificate holder or participating facility that makes available, or a certificate holder who
administers, [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine to an individual who is
experiencing or is believed by the certificate holder or participating facility to be
experiencing anaphylaxis:
(i) Fails to follow standards and procedures for storage and
administration of [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine; or
(ii) Administers [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine
that is beyond the manufacturer’s expiration date.
(b) (1) A cause of action may not arise against any physician for any act or
omission if the physician in good faith prescribes or dispenses [auto–injectable]
EMERGENCY USE epinephrine and the necessary paraphernalia for the administration of
[auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine to a certificate holder or participating
facility under this subtitle.
(2) A cause of action may not arise against any pharmacist for any act or
omission if the pharmacist in good faith dispenses [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE
epinephrine and the necessary paraphernalia for the administration of [auto–injectable]
EMERGENCY USE epinephrine to a certificate holder or a participating facility under this
subtitle.
13–7A–08.
(b) An individual may not be held civilly liable in any action arising from or in
connection with the administration of [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine by
the individual solely because the individual did not possess a certificate issued under this
subtitle.
13–7A–09.
A certificate holder shall submit to the Department, in the manner required under §
13–7A–03 of this subtitle, a report of each incident that occurred on the premises of a
– 11 –

Ch. 711 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
participating facility that involved the administration of [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY
USE epinephrine by a certificate holder or an agent.
Article – Health Occupations
14–5F–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
[(c) “Auto–injectable epinephrine” means a portable, disposable drug delivery
device that contains a premeasured single dose of epinephrine that is used to treat
anaphylaxis in an emergency situation.]
[(d)] (C) “Board” means the State Board of Physicians.
[(e)] (D) “Committee” means the Naturopathic Medicine Advisory Committee.
[(f)] (E) “Council” means the Naturopathic Doctors Formulary Council.
[(g)] (F) (1) “Device” means a device used in the diagnosis, treatment, or
prevention of disease.
(2) “Device” does not include:
(i) Any surgical or dental instrument;
(ii) Any physical therapy equipment;
(iii) Any X–ray apparatus; or
(iv) Any component part or accessory of any of the items listed in
items (i) through (iii) of this paragraph.
(G) “EMERGENCY USE EPINEPHRINE” MEANS A PORTABLE, DISPOSABLE
DRUG DELIVERY DEVICE OR PRODUCT APPROVED BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND
DRUG ADMINISTRATION THAT CONTAINS A PREMEASURED SINGLE DOSE OF
EPINEPHRINE THAT IS USED TO TREAT ANAPHYLAXIS IN AN EMERGENCY SITUATION.
14–5F–04.1.
(a) (1) There is a Naturopathic Doctors Formulary Council within the Board.
(d) (1) The formulary adopted by the Board shall include:
(i) Nonprescription drugs and devices;
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 711
(ii) Prescription oxygen and [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE
epinephrine; and
(iii) Prescription diaphragms and cervical caps for contraception.
14–5F–14.
(a) A license authorizes a licensee, consistent with naturopathic education and
training and competence demonstrated by passing the naturopathic physician licensing
examination, to:
(5) Administer [auto–injectable] EMERGENCY USE epinephrine;
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 13 –